Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 15. Records and Recording

§ 19-15-1.
Preservation of essential public records of county governments; admissibility in evidence of copies of original records.

The Legislature declares that records containing information essential to the operation of government and to the protection of the rights and interests of persons should be protected against the destructive effect of all forms of disaster whether fire, flood, storm, earthquake, explosion or other disaster, and whether such occurrence is caused by an act of nature or man, including an enemy of the United States. It is, therefore, necessary to adopt special provisions for the preservation of essential records of counties, and this section shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes. However, it is the express intention of this section that the provisions herein contained are not mandatory but are permissive only and shall authorize preservation of records as herein contemplated within the discretion of the governing authorities of the counties of the state and in accordance with a records control schedule approved by the Local Government Records Committee as provided in Section 25-60-1.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized and empowered in its discretion to preserve essential records, or any portion thereof, of the county deemed by the board of supervisors to be an essential record necessary to the operation of government in an emergency created by disaster or containing information necessary to protect the rights and interests of persons or to establish and affirm the powers and duties of governments in the resumption of operations after the destruction or damage of the original records.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized and empowered in its discretion to make and enter into contracts and agreements with any person, firm or corporation to make and prepare copies or duplicates of records, and, subject to the standards established by the Department of Archives and History, to provide for and enter into contracts concerning the safekeeping and preservation of copies or duplicates at points of storage at a location approved by the Local Government Records Committee.

In the event that the original record or records shall have been destroyed, the copy or reproduction shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes and shall be treated as an original record in all courts or administrative agencies for the purpose of its admissibility in evidence. An enlargement or facsimile of a reproduction is likewise admissible in evidence if the original reproduction is in existence and available for inspection under direction of court.

The board of supervisors of any such county is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to appropriate and expend monies out of the available funds of the county for the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2900.3; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 11, §§ 1-7; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 31; Laws, 1996, ch. 537, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 495, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 19-15-3.
Reproduction of certain county records; destruction of originals.

Whenever any county records, documents, files or papers whatsoever are required by law to be preserved and retained, or which are necessary or desirable to be preserved or retained, the board of supervisors of the county shall have the power and authority, in its discretion, to destroy or dispose of any records, documents, files or papers after having reproductions made thereof as hereinafter provided and in accordance with a records control schedule approved by the Local Government Records Committee as provided in Section 25-60-1.

Whenever the board of supervisors of any county shall desire to destroy or dispose of any records, documents, files or papers, the board shall first cause the same to be reproduced under standards established by the Department of Archives and History using microfilm, microfiche, data processing, computers, magnetic tape, optical discs or other medium. If the county where records and the like are to be destroyed or disposed of does not have or own the necessary equipment to reproduce same, the board of supervisors shall be authorized and empowered to enter into a contract for the reproduction thereof, which contract may be for a period of not more than twelve (12) months from the date thereof. The contract shall be awarded to the lowest and best bidder after the board of supervisors shall have advertised its intentions of awarding such contract by publication of a notice thereof once each week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published or having a general circulation in such county.

After reproduction of the records and the like shall have been made, the board of supervisors shall have the power and authority to destroy and dispose of the originals thereof after spreading upon its minutes certification that the reproductions are true and correct copies and disposal is in accordance with a records control schedule approved by the Local Government Records Committee as provided in Section 25-60-1; the reproductions shall thereafter be preserved, retained and stored by the board of supervisors as a record of the county, and provision shall be made for preserving, examining and using them. Any reproductions or copy of any original record or other documents shall be deemed to be the original record for all purposes and shall be admissible as evidence in all courts or administrative agencies. A facsimile, exemplification or certified copy thereof shall, for all purposes set forth herein, be deemed to be a transcript, exemplification or certified copy of the original record.

The board of supervisors of any county is hereby authorized to pay all expenses incurred in reproducing records and the like and in making provision for the preservation, retention and storage of the reproductions from the general fund of the county.

When any of the records and the like of which reproductions are made under the provisions of this section are declared by law or are by their nature confidential and privileged records, then the reproduction thereof shall likewise be deemed to be confidential and privileged to the same extent as the original records and the like.

Nothing herein shall be construed to require the keeping and preservation of any records and documents which are not required by law or a records control schedule to be kept and preserved, or which it is not desirable or necessary to keep and preserve, and in all cases where records and the like are authorized by law to be destroyed or disposed of, they may be disposed of as authorized by a records control schedule approved by the Local Government Records Committee as provided in Section 25-60-1.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2900.5; Laws, 1950, ch. 240, §§ 1-6; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 32; Laws, 1996, ch. 537, § 9; Laws, 2006, ch. 495, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 19-15-5.
Equipment for electronic storage of documents for chancery clerks.

The board of supervisors of any county is authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to purchase all the necessary equipment and supplies needed for the electronic storage of documents out of the general fund of said county. Before purchasing such equipment advertisement shall be made, as required by law for letting of bids, and the board shall purchase the equipment from the lowest and best bidder on the type machine desired to be purchased.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2900.7; Laws, 1952, ch. 225; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 19-15-7.
General index of disposed chancery and probate cases; filing system for papers in such cases.

The board of supervisors of any county may, when in its opinion the interest of the county would be served thereby, have made a complete index of all chancery court causes and probate court causes which have been finally disposed of in the courts of the county. Said board may provide for the proper storage and preservation of the original papers in all cases which have been finally disposed of in the chancery court or the probate court of the county. Such general index shall be prepared by the chancery clerk, and the necessary filing system shall be installed under his direction. The board of supervisors shall be authorized to pay to the chancery clerk such reasonable compensation therefor as the board may deem proper.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2899-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 382; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1994).

§ 19-15-9.
Rebinding of record books; transcription of deteriorating record books.

The board of supervisors shall have rebound all record books of conveyances and of last wills and testaments, of indexes thereto, and all other record books of the county that need to be rebound. Said board shall have transcribed into new record books all conveyances and other instruments of record, and indexes thereto, that need to be transcribed for preservation. The cost thereof shall be paid out of the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 299; 1906, § 318; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3691; 1930, § 224; 1942, § 2900.

§ 19-15-11.
Record of abstracts of title.

The board of supervisors of any county may, when in its opinion the interest of the county would be subserved thereby, procure by purchase or have made, a complete abstract of titles to land in the county, and may provide all books necessary for the purpose. The costs thereof shall be paid out of the county treasury. Such abstracts, when purchased or made, shall be kept in the office of the chancery clerk of the county as a public record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 301; 1906, § 320; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3693; 1930, § 226; 1942, § 2902.

§§ 19-15-13 and 19-15-15.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1993, ch. 546, § 2, eff from and after January 1, 1994.

§19-15-13. [Codes, 1892, § 302; 1906, § 321; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3694; 1930, § 227; 1942, § 2903; Laws, 1920, ch. 255]

§19-15-15. [Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 3694a; 1930, § 228; 1942,§ 2904; Laws, 1920, ch. 255]